District of Columbia statutes.
7-172

Assistant Director of Public Health to be physician and discharge duties of health officer during his absence or disability.

The Assistant Director of Public Health shall be a physician, and during the absence of or disability of the Director of Public Health shall act as Director of Public Health and discharge the duties incident to that position.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 961, ch. 150
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.
1973 Ed., § 6-109.
1981 Ed., § 6-108.